Nevada, session 83, AB492.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 706 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 9, a certificate
holder who is an operator of a limousine in a county whose
population is 700,000 or more may, upon approval from the
Authority, lease a limousine to an independent contractor who is
not a certificate holder. A certificate holder may lease only one
limousine to each independent contractor with whom the person
enters into a lease agreement. The limousine may be used in a
manner authorized by the certificate holder’s certificate of public
convenience and necessity.
2. A certificate holder who enters into a lease agreement with
an independent contractor pursuant to this section shall submit a
copy of the agreement to the Authority for its approval. The
agreement is not effective until approved by the Authority.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 9, the Authority
may not limit the number of:
(a) Lease agreements entered into by a certificate holder; or
(b) Days for which a lease agreement remains in effect.
4. A certificate holder who leases a limousine to an
independent contractor shall inspect the limousine not less than
once each month.
-
*AB492*

– 3 –
5. An independent contractor may not operate more than one
limousine pursuant to a lease agreement with a certificate holder
during any one 24-hour period.
6. An independent contractor operating a limousine pursuant
to this section must:
(a) Charge and collect the technology fee imposed pursuant to
paragraph (a) of subsection 2 of NRS 706.465, if applicable; and
(b) Remit to the Authority, not later than the 10th day of each
month, all technology fees collected for the immediately preceding
month.
7. A certificate holder who leases a limousine to an
independent contractor is jointly and severally liable with the
independent contractor for any violation of the provisions of this
chapter or the regulations adopted pursuant thereto and shall
ensure that the independent contractor complies with such
provisions and regulations.
8. The Authority or any of its employees may intervene in a
civil action involving a lease agreement entered into pursuant to
this section.
9. A certificate holder may not have a number of unexpired
leases that exceeds 75 percent of the number of limousines the
Authority has authorized the certificate holder to operate.
Sec. 2. NRS 706.011 is hereby amended to read as follows:
706.011 As used in NRS 706.011 to 706.791, inclusive, and
section 1 of this act, unless the context otherwise requires, the
words and terms defined in NRS 706.013 to 706.146, inclusive,
have the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 3. NRS 706.101 is hereby amended to read as follows:
706.101 “Operator” means a person, other than a lienholder,
having a property interest in or title to a vehicle. Except as otherwise
provided in this section, the term includes a person entitled to the
use and possession of a vehicle under a lease or contract for the
purpose of transporting persons or property. The term does not
include a person who is the lessee of a taxicab pursuant to NRS
706.473 [.] or the lessee of a limousine pursuant to section 1 of
this act.
Sec. 4. NRS 706.465 is hereby amended to read as follows:
706.465 1. An operator of a limousine shall, beginning on
July 1, 2003, and on July 1 of each year thereafter, pay to the
Authority a fee of $100 for each limousine that the Authority has
authorized the operator to operate.
2. [An] Except as otherwise provided in section 1 of this act,
an operator of a limousine shall:
(a) Charge and collect a technology fee in an amount set by the
Authority for each compensable trip by a limousine that the
-
*AB492*

– 4 –
Authority has authorized the operator to operate, if a computerized
real-time data system is used for the purposes set forth in NRS
706.165; and
(b) Remit to the Authority, not later than the 10th day of each
month, all technology fees collected by the operator pursuant to this
subsection for the immediately preceding month.
 The fee charged pursuant to this subsection may only be charged
within a county whose population is 700,000 or more, and may be
included in the operator’s tariff.
3. Any person who fails to pay any fee on or before the date
provided in this section shall pay a penalty of 10 percent of the
amount of the fee, plus interest on the amount of the fee at the rate
of 1 percent per month or fraction of a month, from the date the fee
is due until the date of payment.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Computerized real-time data system” means the
computerized real-time data system implemented by the Authority
pursuant to subsection 3 of NRS 706.1516.
(b) “Limousine” includes:
(1) A livery limousine; and
(2) A traditional limousine.
Sec. 5. NRS 706.475 is hereby amended to read as follows:
706.475 1. The Authority shall adopt such regulations as are
necessary to:
(a) Carry out the provisions of NRS 706.473 [;] and section 1 of
this act; and
(b) Ensure that the taxicab [business remains] and limousine
businesses remain safe, adequate and reliable.
2. Such regulations must include, without limitation:
(a) The minimum qualifications for an independent contractor;
(b) Requirements related to liability insurance;
(c) Minimum safety standards; and
(d) The procedure for approving a lease agreement and the
provisions that must be included in a lease agreement concerning
the grounds for the revocation of such approval.
Sec. 6. NRS 706.736 is hereby amended to read as follows:
706.736 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, the
provisions of NRS 706.011 to 706.791, inclusive, and section 1 of
this act do not apply to:
(a) The transportation by a contractor licensed by the State
Contractors’ Board of the contractor’s own equipment in the
contractor’s own vehicles from job to job.
(b) Any person engaged in transporting the person’s own
personal effects in the person’s own vehicle, but the provisions of
this subsection do not apply to any person engaged in transportation
-
*AB492*

– 5 –
by vehicle of property sold or to be sold, or used by the person in
the furtherance of any commercial enterprise other than as provided
in paragraph (d), or to the carriage of any property for
compensation.
(c) Special mobile equipment.
(d) The vehicle of any person, when that vehicle is being used in
the production of motion pictures, including films to be shown in
theaters and on television, industrial training and educational films,
commercials for television and video discs and tapes.
(e) A private motor carrier of property which is used for any
convention, show, exhibition, sporting event, carnival, circus or
organized recreational activity.
(f) A private motor carrier of property which is used to attend
livestock shows and sales.
(g) The transportation by a private school of persons or property
in connection with the operation of the school or related school
activities, so long as the vehicle that is used to transport the persons
or property does not have a gross vehicle weight rating of 26,001
pounds or more and is not registered pursuant to NRS 706.801 to
706.861, inclusive.
2. Unless exempted by a specific state statute or a specific
federal statute, regulation or rule, any person referred to in
subsection 1 is subject to:
(a) The provisions of paragraph (d) of subsection 1 of NRS
706.171 and NRS 706.235 to 706.256, inclusive, 706.281, 706.457
and 706.458.
(b) All rules and regulations adopted by reference pursuant to
paragraph (b) of subsection 1 of NRS 706.171 concerning the safety
of drivers and vehicles.
(c) All standards adopted by regulation pursuant to
NRS 706.173.
3. The provisions of NRS 706.311 to 706.453, inclusive, and
section 1 of this act, 706.471, 706.473, 706.475 and 706.6411
which authorize the Authority to issue:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b), certificates of
public convenience and necessity and contract carriers’ permits and
to regulate rates, routes and services apply only to fully regulated
carriers.
(b) Certificates of public convenience and necessity to operators
of tow cars and to regulate rates for towing services performed
without the prior consent of the owner of the vehicle or the person
authorized by the owner to operate the vehicle apply to operators of
tow cars.
4. Any person who operates pursuant to a claim of an
exemption provided by this section but who is found to be operating
-
*AB492*

– 6 –
in a manner not covered by any of those exemptions immediately
becomes liable, in addition to any other penalties provided in this
chapter, for the fee appropriate to the person’s actual operation as
prescribed in this chapter, computed from the date when that
operation began.
5. As used in this section, “private school” means a nonprofit
private elementary or secondary educational institution that is
licensed in this State.
Sec. 7. NRS 706.756 is hereby amended to read as follows:
706.756 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, any
person who:
(a) Operates a vehicle or causes it to be operated in any carriage
to which the provisions of NRS 706.011 to 706.861, inclusive, and
section 1 of this act apply without first obtaining a certificate,
permit or license, or in violation of the terms thereof;
(b) Fails to make any return or report required by the provisions
of NRS 706.011 to 706.861, inclusive, and section 1 of this act or
by the Authority or the Department pursuant to the provisions of
NRS 706.011 to 706.861, inclusive [;] , and section 1 of this act;
(c) Violates, or procures, aids or abets the violating of, any
provision of NRS 706.011 to 706.861, inclusive [;] , and section 1
of this act;
(d) Fails to obey any order, decision or regulation of the
Authority or the Department;
(e) Procures, aids or abets any person in the failure to obey such
an order, decision or regulation of the Authority or the Department;
(f) Advertises, solicits, proffers bids or otherwise is held out to
perform transportation as a common or contract carrier in violation
of any of the provisions of NRS 706.011 to 706.861, inclusive [;] ,
and section 1 of this act.
(g) Advertises as providing:
(1) The services of a fully regulated carrier; or
(2) Towing services,
 without including the number of the person’s certificate of public
convenience and necessity or contract carrier’s permit in each
advertisement;
(h) Knowingly offers, gives, solicits or accepts any rebate,
concession or discrimination in violation of the provisions of this
chapter;
(i) Knowingly, willfully and fraudulently seeks to evade or
defeat the purposes of this chapter;
(j) Operates or causes to be operated a vehicle which does not
have the proper identifying device;
-
*AB492*

– 7 –
(k) Displays or causes or permits to be displayed a certificate,
permit, license or identifying device, knowing it to be fictitious or to
have been cancelled, revoked, suspended or altered;
(l) Lends or knowingly permits the use of by one not entitled
thereto any certificate, permit, license or identifying device issued to
the person so lending or permitting the use thereof; or
(m) Refuses or fails to surrender to the Authority or Department
any certificate, permit, license or identifying device which has been
suspended, cancelled or revoked pursuant to the provisions of this
chapter,
 is guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof shall be
punished by a fine of not less than $100 nor more than $1,000, or by
imprisonment in the county jail for not more than 6 months, or by
both fine and imprisonment.
2. Any person who, in violation of the provisions of NRS
706.386, operates as a fully regulated common motor carrier without
first obtaining a certificate of public convenience and necessity or
any person who, in violation of the provisions of NRS 706.421,
operates as a contract motor carrier without first obtaining a permit
is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished:
(a) For a first offense within a period of 12 consecutive months,
by a fine of not less than $500 nor more than $1,000. In addition to
the fine, the person may be punished by imprisonment in the county
jail for not more than 6 months.
(b) For a second offense within a period of 12 consecutive
months and for each subsequent offense that is committed within a
period of 12 consecutive months of any prior offense under this
subsection, by a fine of $1,000. In addition to the fine, the person
may be punished by imprisonment in the county jail for not more
than 6 months.
3. Any person who, in violation of the provisions of NRS
706.386, operates or permits the operation of a vehicle in passenger
service without first obtaining a certificate of public convenience
and necessity is guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
4. If a law enforcement officer witnesses a violation of any
provision of subsection 2 or 3, the law enforcement officer may
cause the vehicle to be towed immediately from the scene and
impounded in accordance with NRS 706.476.
5. The fines provided in this section are mandatory and must
not be reduced under any circumstances by the court.
6. Any bail allowed must not be less than the appropriate fine
provided for by this section.
Sec. 8. NRS 706.781 is hereby amended to read as follows:
706.781 In addition to all the other remedies provided by NRS
706.011 to 706.861, inclusive, and section 1 of this act for the
-
*AB492*

– 8 –
prevention and punishment of any violation of the provisions thereof
and of all orders of the Authority or the Department, the Authority
or the Department may compel compliance with the provisions of
NRS 706.011 to 706.861, inclusive, and section 1 of this act and
with the orders of the Authority or the Department by proceedings
in mandamus, injunction or by other civil remedies.
Sec. 9. NRS 706.791 is hereby amended to read as follows:
706.791 1. If the Department is not satisfied with the records
or statements of, or with the amount of fees paid by, any person
pursuant to the provisions of NRS 706.011 to 706.861, inclusive,
and section 1 of this act, it may make an additional or estimated
assessment of fees due from that person based upon any information
available to it.
2. Every additional or estimated assessment bears interest at
the rate of 1 percent per month, or fraction thereof, from the date the
fees were due until they are paid.
3. If an assessment is imposed, a penalty of 10 percent of the
amount of the assessment must be added thereto. If any part of the
deficiency is found to be caused by fraud or an intent to evade
the provisions of this chapter or the regulations adopted pursuant to
this chapter, a penalty of 25 percent of the amount of the assessment
must be added thereto.
4. The Department shall give the person written notice of the
assessment. The notice may be served personally or by mail in the
manner prescribed by Rule 5 of the Nevada Rules of Civil
Procedure addressed to the person at the person’s address as it
appears in the records of the Department. Every notice of
assessment must be served within 36 months after the end of the
registration year for which the additional assessment is imposed.
5. If any person refuses or fails to make available to the
Department, upon request, such records, reports or other information
as determined by the Department to be necessary to enable it to
determine that the amount of taxes and fees paid by that person is
correct, the assessment made pursuant to the provisions of this
section is presumed to be correct and the burden is upon the person
challenging the assessment to establish that it is erroneous.
6. Any person against whom an assessment has been made
pursuant to the provisions of this section may petition the
Department in writing for a redetermination within 30 days after
service of the notice. If a petition is not filed with the Department
within that period, the assessment becomes final.
7. If a petition for redetermination is filed within 30 days, the
Department shall reconsider the assessment and send the petitioner,
by certified mail, notice of its decision and the reasons therefor. A
petitioner aggrieved by the Department’s decision may appeal the
-
*AB492*

– 9 –
decision by submitting a written request to the Department for a
hearing not later than 30 days after notice of the decision was
mailed by the Department. The Department shall schedule an
administrative hearing and provide the petitioner with 10 days’
notice of the time and place of the hearing. The Department may
continue the hearing as may be necessary.
8. The order of the Department upon a petition becomes final
30 days after service of notice thereof. If an assessment is not paid
on or before the date it becomes final, there must be added thereto in
addition to any other penalty provided for in this chapter a penalty
of 10 percent of the amount of the assessment.
9. Every remittance in payment of an assessment is payable to
the Department.
Sec. 10. 1. This section becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
2. Sections 1 to 9, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On October 1, 2025, for all other purposes.
H
-
*AB492*